Utah statutes.
10-7-74.   Execution on judgment against corporation.

Whenever a fine and costs, either or both, shall be imposed upon a corporation upon conviction for a violation of a city or town ordinance, judgment therefor may be collected on execution issued out of the court in the same manner as an execution in a civil action.



No Change Since 1953

